South Carolina, session 2025-2026, S939.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Article 1, Chapter 11, Title 9 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 9-11-115.  Upon receipt by the system of the satisfactory proof of death of a member of the system who had not served long enough to fully vest in the system and whose death was a natural and proximate result of an injury by external accident or violence incurred while undergoing a hazard peculiar to the member's employment while in the actual performance of his duty, provided that his death is not the result of the member's wilful negligence, suicide, or intentionally self-inflicted bodily injury, there must be paid to the member's designated beneficiary a one-time, lump sum benefit payment equal to the greater of his accumulated contributions or seventy-five thousand dollars. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----